District of Columbia statutes.
20-907

Funeral expenses.

Where an estate is solvent and the will expressly empowers a personal representative to pay funeral expenses in an amount left to the personal representative’s discretion, then no allowance from the Court shall be required. In all other cases, the Court may allow, in its discretion, funeral expenses of the decedent in excess of $1,500 according to the condition and circumstances of the decedent, but in no event shall such allowance exceed $5,000. However, the funeral expenses limit for a solvent estate may be waived if the waiver is in writing, signed by all heirs or legatees, and filed with the Register.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(hhh), 42 DCR 63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-741.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-907.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-905.